Utah statutes.
62A-11-505.   Responsibilities of the office.

The office shall document and distribute payments in the manner provided for and in the time required by Section 62A-11-413 and federal law upon receipt of:

(1)  a copy of the written notice sent to the payor under Section 62A-11-502 or Section 62A-11-504;

(2)  the order of support;

(3)  the obligee's address; and

(4)  withheld income from the payor.

